Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-528
Health claim form; acceptance and utilization required.

No issuer, institutional care provider, or health care practitioner shall contract with any person or employer, union, or other organization under which health care services or benefits are provided unless such person or organization accepts and utilizes or agrees to accept and utilize the uniform claim form for claims for health care services and benefits provided to employees or members.

Laws 1994, LB 1222, § 56.